District of Columbia statutes.
Omitted

4-104

Board of Public Welfare — Officers; meetings; authority to make rules, regulations, and orders.

Omitted.

Omission of Text

The provisions of former § 4-104 have been omitted as obsolete, the Board referred to herein having been abolished. See notes following § 4-102.